Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Animal" means a nonhuman member of the kingdom animalia encompassing all vertebrate and invertebrate species, including mammals, birds, fish, reptiles, amphibians, shellfish, and insects. (2) "Aquatic invasive species" has the same meaning as in RCW 77.135.010.(3) "Aquatic plant" has the same meaning as in RCW 77.135.010.(4) "Invasive species" has the same meaning as in RCW 77.135.010.(5) "Retail pet store" means a commercial establishment that engages in a for-profit business of selling at retail animals to be kept as household pets and is regulated by the United States department of agriculture.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A retail pet store that sells animals as pets, including exotic animals, or aquatic plants shall provide to customers who purchase an animal or aquatic plant an informational pamphlet prepared by the Washington invasive species council established under RCW 79A.25.320 that is related to either the animal family or the aquatic plant the customer purchases. At a minimum, the pamphlet shall include information about:(1) Invasive species or aquatic invasive species and the threat these species present to native ecosystems;(2) Problems that can arise if an animal with no natural predators is released into the natural environment;(3) Actions a customer can take in the event the customer needs to rehome an animal, including a list of entities who may accept the animal;(4) Actions a customer can take in the event the customer needs to dispose of unwanted aquatic plant material;(5) Additional resources to identify invasive species and invasive aquatic species, including how aquatic plants can sometimes harbor invasive species; and(6) Applicable state laws that prohibit the possession, transport, or trafficking of prohibited invasive species and aquatic invasive species.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 16 RCW.--- END ---